District of Columbia statutes.
14-502

Records of deeds, instruments, and wills.

Under the hand of the keeper of a record and the seal of the court or office in which the record was made:

(1)

a copy of the record of a deed, or other written instrument not of a testamentary character, where the laws of the State, territory, commonwealth, possession or country where it was recorded require such a record, and that has been recorded agreeably to those laws; and

(2)

a copy of a will that the laws require to be admitted to probate and record by judicial decree, and of the decree of the court admitting the will to probate and record —

are good and sufficient prima facie evidence to prove the existence and contents of the deed, will, or other written instrument, and that it was executed as it purports to have been executed.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 521, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Irregular deeds legalized, see § 42-408.
Surveyor’s records, transcript, see § 1-1311.
1981 Ed., § 14-502.
1973 Ed., § 14-502.